California statutes. Education Code
(b) (1) On or before May 31, 2023, the Intersegmental Committee of the Academic Senates of the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges shall establish a singular lower division general education pathway that meets the academic requirements necessary for transfer admission to both the California State University and University of California. If the Intersegmental Committee of the Academic Senates of the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges is unable to come to agreement on or before May 31, 2023, the respective administrative bodies of those segments shall establish a singular lower division general education pathway that meets the academic requirements necessary for
 transfer admission to the California State University and the University of California by December 31, 2023.

(2) Commencing with the fall term of the 2025–26 academic year, the singular lower division general education pathway established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be the only lower division general education pathway used to determine academic eligibility and sufficient academic preparation for transfer admission to the California State University and the University of California.

(3) The singular lower division general education pathway established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not lengthen the time-to-degree and shall not include more units than is required under the Intersegmental General Education Transfer Curriculum on July 31, 2021.

(c) (1) On or before August 1, 2024, where ADTs for major pathways exist, the California Community Colleges shall place students on the ADT pathway if students declare a goal of transfer on their mandatory education plans pursuant to the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012 (Article 1 (commencing with Section 78210) of Chapter 2 of Part 48 of Division 7) and such a pathway exists for their intended major, to maximize the probability that students will transfer into a four-year postsecondary educational institution and earn a degree in their chosen field of study in a timely manner, and to minimize the accrual of excess units.

(2) A student may opt out of the ADT pathway for a local associate degree or if the student plans to apply to transfer to a University
 of California campus or an independent institution of higher education defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010. Each community college shall use their existing processes for student education plans pursuant to the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012 (Article 1 (commencing with Section 78210) of Chapter 2 of Part 48 of Division 7) and enrollments to implement the opt-out feature where an ADT exists.

(3) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a student from being on the ADT pathway and also applying to transfer to a University of California campus or an independent institution of higher education defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010.

(4) If an ADT pathway does not exist in the student’s chosen major, then there is no ADT pathway on which to place the
 student. This subdivision does not apply to students seeking to complete a community college baccalaureate degree program or a career technical education program that does not have an ADT pathway.

(d) Funding appropriated in the Budget Act of 2021 or subsequent budget acts to support the continued implementation of a guided pathways program pursuant to the California Community College Guided Pathways Grant Program established pursuant to Part 54.81 (commencing with Section 88920) of Division 7 may be used by community colleges to implement this section. It is the intent of the Legislature that community colleges also prioritize additional funding received in the 2021–22 fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year to assist students’ success through transfer programs to the extent the activities performed pursuant to this section are not
 prohibited by the legislative appropriations.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 566, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 696, Sec. 3.   (AB 2057)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

66749.81.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “ADT” means associate degree for transfer.

(2) “Four-year postsecondary educational institution” means a campus of the University of California or the California State University or an independent institution of higher education defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010.

(3) “STEM” means science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.

(4) “TMC” means transfer model curriculum, or transfer model curricula, as appropriate.

(b) (1) The 60-unit lower division maximum requirement shall be retained for an ADT, with the exception of paragraph (2).

(2) For STEM major pathways identified as high-unit STEM pathways by the Associate Degree for Transfer Intersegmental Implementation Committee established pursuant to Section 66749.8, ADT pathways may be established that contain up to, but no more than, 66 units of lower division coursework, and require the submission of clear evidence and rationale for the one to six additional units of lower division coursework proposed during the TMC approval process. This clear evidence and rationale shall include both of the following:

(A) An explanation of which proposed additional units do not fit within the 60-unit lower division maximum requirement for ADT pathways.

(B) An explanation of the need
 for one to six additional units to be added to the lower division coursework to earn an ADT that fall within the academic major preparation for the TMC.

(3) The clear evidence and rationale described in paragraph (2) shall first be reviewed by the Intersegmental Curriculum Council, and then reviewed by the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(4) The clear evidence and rationale described in paragraph (2) shall be posted publicly on the internet website of the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(c) (1) On or before January 1, 2025, TMC drafts shall be submitted to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges for the high-unit STEM pathways of biology, chemistry, computer science, engineering, environmental science,
 mathematics, and physics for the purposes of meeting admissions eligibility to both the California State University and the University of California segments, and other four-year institutions that choose to participate in the ADT, such as members of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities and Historically Black Colleges and Universities currently engaged with the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. Where a single TMC to both the University of California and the California State University is not possible, clear evidence and rationale explaining why separate TMCs are needed shall be required and submitted to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, and the office of the President of the University of California. This clear evidence and rationale shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The additional courses and units that determine a single TMC is not possible.

(B) The programs and campuses of the California State University and the University of California that determine a single TMC is not possible.

(C) Data on transfer student enrollment, retention, progression, and success outcomes where available within each system that demonstrate the need for separate TMCs.

(2) The clear evidence and rationale described in paragraph (1) shall be posted publicly on the internet website of the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(d) (1) Within 18 months of the creation of California Community Colleges Chancellor’s Office templates for a new TMC, or the approval of revisions to an
 existing TMC, community colleges shall create an ADT for each TMC adopted in every major and area of emphasis offered by the community college pursuant to subdivision (c).

(2) Within 12 months of the approval of a TMC pursuant to paragraph (1), each California State University campus shall determine similarity of the TMC to a baccalaureate degree in a similar major to the TMC. University of California and Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities campuses are encouraged to identify those TMCs that fulfill major preparation requirements for guaranteed transfer admission with an ADT.

(3) For the purposes of determining similarity pursuant to paragraph (2), after a TMC is created or revised for a major, each California State University campus shall determine if there is a baccalaureate degree in a similar major to the TMC. This determination of similarity shall
 ensure that students who earn the ADT, that is created under the parameters of that TMC, are guaranteed admission in that similar major at one of the California State University campuses offering that major and shall be required to complete no more than 60 units after transfer to earn the baccalaureate degree that is deemed similar to the major of the ADT if the student stays on that ADT pathway.

(e) Transparency concerning the membership and composition of the faculty discipline review groups and other intersegmental curriculum groups is required as follows:

(1) For each faculty discipline review group, the Academic Senate for California Community Colleges shall regularly report to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and the Academic Senate of the California State University shall regularly report to the office of the Chancellor of the California
 State University, all of the following:

(A) The total number of faculty members serving on each faculty discipline review group, including all of the following:

(i) The number of faculty members who work as instructional faculty for a California community college.

(ii) The number of faculty members who work as instructional faculty for a California State University campus.

(iii) The number of faculty members who work as instructional faculty for a University of California campus.

(iv) The number of faculty members who work as instructional faculty for an independent institution of higher education, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010.

(B) The names of each faculty member serving on a faculty discipline review group.

(C) The postsecondary educational institution where each faculty member serving on a faculty discipline review group works as an instructional faculty member.

(D) The academic disciplines in which each faculty member serving on a faculty discipline review group provides classroom instruction at a postsecondary educational institution.

(2) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall regularly update their internet websites to reflect the membership and composition of the segment’s faculty members serving on faculty discipline review groups pursuant to paragraph
 (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 65.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66749.9.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the University of California Associate Degree for Transfer Pilot Program.

(b) (1) The University of California, Los Angeles shall do both of the following:

(A) By the 2026–27 academic year, declare at least eight majors at the University of California, Los Angeles as similar to the transfer model curricula from select community colleges chosen by the University of California, Los Angeles and prioritize admission of a student who earns an associate degree for transfer and meets the requirements of one of the transfer model curricula.

(B) (i) By the 2028–29 academic year, declare at least 12 majors, with at least 4 of those 12 majors in the science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) fields, at the University of California, Los Angeles as similar to the transfer model curricula from select community colleges chosen by the University of California, Los Angeles and prioritize admission of a student who earns an associate degree for transfer and meets the requirements of one of the transfer model curricula.

(ii) The University of California, Los Angeles shall make every effort to ensure that the transfer model curricula declared similar to the STEM majors do not require the completion of more than 60 semester units and if one or more of the transfer model curricula do not meet
 this limit, the University of California, Los Angeles shall provide a written justification to the Legislature detailing what attempts were made to adhere to the limit and demonstrate how the transfer model curricula can be completed in no more than 66 semester units or the equivalent of two additional courses above 60 semester units.

(2) By the 2028–29 academic year, the University of California shall designate at least five campuses of the University of California to declare at least 12 majors at the applicable campus as similar to the transfer model curricula from select community colleges chosen by that campus, except that the 12 major minimum shall not apply to the University of California, Merced if designated, and prioritize admission of a student who earns an associate degree for transfer and meets the requirements of one of the
 transfer model curricula.

(c) The applicable campus of the University of California shall determine the appropriate admissions preference for a student who earns an associate degree for transfer and meets the requirements of one of the transfer model curricula described in subdivision (b).

(d) For a student who earns an associate degree for transfer and meets the requirements of one of the transfer model curricula described in subdivision (b), in addition to other University of California admission requirements, but is not granted admission to the applicable campus of the University of California, that campus shall redirect the student to other campuses of the University of California and the student shall be offered admission to at least one other campus of the University of
 California.

(e) (1) By February 1, 2027, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall review the pilot program and submit an interim report to the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, the Senate Committee on Education, and the respective education finance budget subcommittees of the Assembly and the Senate on the pilot program that includes relevant information on admissions and redirection outcomes.

(2) By June 1, 2030, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall review the pilot program and submit a final report on the pilot program to the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, the Senate Committee on Education, and the respective education finance budget subcommittees of the Assembly and the Senate. The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall make the final report publicly
 available and the Regents of the University of California shall consider and discuss the final report during an open session of a regularly scheduled meeting of the regents. The final report shall include additional information on admissions, redirection, student demographics, and student completion outcomes, and recommendations on whether and how the pilot program can or should be extended or expanded. The recommendations shall take into consideration relevant information, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Factors such as negative impacts on student diversity or the freshman to transfer student ratio, as determined by the University of California.

(B) The pilot program’s impact on streamlining transfer pathways for community college students.

(C) Best practices from other similar programs, such as the University of California, Merced Transfer Project.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that, by the 2031–32 academic year, each undergraduate campus of the University of California will declare at least 12 majors, and evaluate the possibility of declaring at least 16 majors, at the respective campus as similar to the transfer model curricula from select community colleges chosen by the campus and prioritize admission of a student who earns an associate degree for transfer and meets the requirements of one of the transfer model curricula. However, these 12 and 16 major minimums do not apply to the University of California, Merced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 38.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Cross-Enrollment [66750. - 66754.]

66750.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Home campus” means the campus at which the student is matriculated.

(b) “Host campus” means the campus to which the student seeks access.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 552, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

66751.

Any student enrolled in any campus of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California who meets the requirements of Section 66752 may enroll without formal admission and, except as provided in Section 66753, payment of additional fees, in a maximum of one course per academic term at a campus of either of the other systems on a space available basis at the discretion of the appropriate campus authorities on both campuses. A student enrolled in a course pursuant to this chapter shall be provided access to necessary instructional support services at the host campus in the same manner as students regularly enrolled in the course.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 552, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

66752.

A student is qualified to participate in the program established by this chapter if he or she is enrolled in any campus of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California and meets the following requirements:

(a) The student has completed at least one term at the home campus as a matriculated student and is taking at least six units at the home campus during the current term.

(b) The student has attained a grade point average of 2.0 (grade of C) for work completed.

(c) The student has paid appropriate tuition or fees, or both, required by the home campus for the academic term in which the student seeks to cross-enroll.

(d) The student has the appropriate academic preparation, as determined by the host campus, consistent with the standard applied to currently enrolled students, to enroll in the course in which the student seeks to enroll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 552, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

66752.5.

Courses that are not state-supported, including extension and summer session courses, are not subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 552, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

66753.

(a) (1) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the Chancellor of the California State University, and the President of the University of California shall establish procedures so that a student meeting the requirements of Section 66752 may be certified by the home campus as to eligibility, residence, fee, financial aid, and health status.

(2) The host campus may require the applicant to submit additional information as needed. The host campus may charge participating students an administration fee, not to exceed an amount sufficient for the campus to recover the full amount of the administrative costs it incurs under this chapter.

(b) A student enrolled pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from participation in the matriculation services described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 78210) of Chapter 2 of Part 48.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 457, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

66753.5.

The enrollment of a student at a host campus pursuant to this chapter shall not be counted in the calculation of headcount or full-time equivalent student enrollment at the host campus. The home campus may count in the calculation of headcount or full-time equivalent student enrollment only those units for which the student is enrolled at the home campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 38.7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

66754.

This chapter shall become operative commencing with the fall 1995 term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 552, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.6. Cross-Enrollment in Online Education at California State University [66760. - 66764.]

66760.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Chancellor” means the Chancellor of the California State University.

(b) “CSU” means the California State University.

(c) “Home campus” means the California State University campus at which the student matriculates.

(d) “Host campus” means the campus to which the student seeks access.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 363, Sec. 2.   (AB 386)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66760.5.

A California resident enrolled at a CSU campus who meets the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 66761 may enroll, without formal admission, and without payment of additional tuition or fees, except as provided in Section 66761.5, in a course provided entirely online by another CSU campus on a space-available basis. Nonresident and international CSU students who meet these conditions may also enroll in an online course provided by another CSU campus, but shall pay the per unit fees for this course at the host campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.   (AB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

66761.

(a) A student is qualified to participate in the program established by this chapter if he or she is enrolled at a CSU campus and meets the following requirements:

(1) The student has attained a grade point average of 2.0 on a 4-point scale for work completed.

(2) The student has paid appropriate tuition or fees, or both, required by the home campus for full-time enrollment for the academic term in which the student seeks to cross-enroll.

(3) The student has no outstanding tuition or fees to be paid at the home campus.

(b) Each CSU campus shall inform students who may enroll in an online course pursuant to this chapter of all of the following:

(1) The technical requirements a student must satisfy in order to successfully participate in, and complete, the online course.

(2) Any prerequisite courses or other academic preparation deemed necessary for the online course.

(3) Any materials, skills, knowledge, or other elements necessary to ensure a student’s opportunity to succeed in the online course.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 363, Sec. 2.   (AB 386)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66761.5.

The host campus may charge participating students a reasonable administration fee and specific course-based fees, not to exceed an amount sufficient for the campus to recover reasonable administrative costs it incurs pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 363, Sec. 2.   (AB 386)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66762.

The chancellor’s office shall establish a convenient online methodology so that students meeting the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 66761 may do both of the following:

(a) Be informed of the opportunity to access courses provided entirely online by another CSU campus.

(b) Simultaneously enroll in courses at their home campus and enroll in courses provided entirely online at another CSU campus, as provided for in Section 66762.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 363, Sec. 2.   (AB 386)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66762.5.

A matriculated CSU student shall have priority access to online courses provided at his or her home campus. A CSU student who meets the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 66761, and seeks to enroll in courses provided entirely online by another CSU campus, shall be able to enroll, provided that cross-enrollment students generally have an opportunity to enroll in these online courses at any time after the priority enrollment period for continuing students, as determined by each host campus. The enrollment policy of the host campus shall, to the extent possible, encourage cross-enrollment as provided for in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 44.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

66763.

A course provided entirely online pursuant to this chapter shall be accepted for credit at the student’s home campus on the same basis as it would be for a student matriculated at the host campus.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 363, Sec. 2.   (AB 386)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66763.5.

The enrollment of a student at a host campus pursuant to this chapter may be counted in the calculation of headcount or full-time equivalent student enrollment at the host campus. The home campus and the host campus at which the student is cross-enrolled may count in the calculation of headcount or full-time equivalent student enrollment only those units for which the student is enrolled at each respective campus.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 363, Sec. 2.   (AB 386)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66764.

The trustees shall establish both of the following:

(a) An easily accessible online database of online courses available at all CSU campuses. This database shall provide CSU students with a streamlined process within the CSU system to allow students to find and enroll in courses that will earn them credit toward graduation, general education, and major requirements.

(b) Plans for an intrasystem cross-enrollment process to expedite student learning that will be operational at the beginning of the 2015–16 academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 524, Sec. 2.   (AB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.7. Cross-Enrollment in Online Education between Campuses of the California Community Colleges [66770. - 66773.5.]

66770.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “California Virtual Campus” means the efforts to expand the delivery of courses through technology pursuant to Schedule 26 and Provision 42 of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2013 (Chapter 20 of the Statutes of 2013).

(b) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(c) “Home college” means the campus of the California Community Colleges at which a student is matriculated.

(d) “Online course exchange” means the technological mechanism used by the California
 Virtual Campus to offer online-only courses that have highest demand, fill quickly, and are prerequisites for many different courses.

(e) “Teaching college” means the campus of the California Community Colleges to which a student seeks access.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 188, Sec. 2.   (SB 886)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66770.5.

(a) A California resident who meets the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 66771 and who is enrolled at a home college may enroll, without formal admission, and without payment of additional fees or tuition, in a course provided entirely online by a teaching college, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 66771.

(b) A nonresident student or an international student who satisfies the conditions set forth in subdivision (a) may enroll in an online course provided by a teaching college, but shall be required to pay nonresident tuition for this course at the teaching college in accordance with Section 76140.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 743, Sec. 1.   (AB 637)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

66771.

(a) A student is qualified to participate in the program established by this chapter if the student is enrolled at a home college that is part of the California Virtual Campus and meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The student has attained a grade point average of at least 2.0 on a 4-point scale for completed coursework.

(2) The student has paid the appropriate fees and tuition required by the home college for enrollment in the academic term in which the student proposes to cross-enroll.

(3) The student has no outstanding fees or tuition to be paid at the home college.

(b) A teaching college shall inform each student who enrolls in an online course pursuant to this chapter of all of the following:

(1) The technical requirements that must be satisfied by a student in order to successfully participate in, and complete, the online course.

(2) Any prerequisite course, or other academic preparation, deemed necessary for enrollment in the online course.

(3) Any materials, skills, knowledge, or other elements that are necessary to ensure that a student has an opportunity to succeed in the online course.

(c) The teaching college shall charge participating students the appropriate course enrollment fees for residents as applicable and to the extent required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 188, Sec. 3.   (SB 886)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66772.

The chancellor’s office shall establish a convenient online methodology so that a student who meets the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 66771 may accomplish all of the following:

(a) Be informed of the opportunity to access courses provided entirely online by another teaching college.

(b) Simultaneously enroll in courses at his or her home college and courses provided entirely online by another teaching college.

(c) Provide consent to electronically transfer all relevant enrollment data to the teaching college.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 743, Sec. 1.   (AB 637)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

66773.

A course provided entirely online pursuant to this chapter shall be accepted for credit at the student’s home college on the same basis as it would be for a student matriculated at the teaching college.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 743, Sec. 1.   (AB 637)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

66773.5.

The enrollment of a student at a teaching college pursuant to this chapter may be counted in the calculation of headcount or full-time equivalent student enrollment at the teaching college. The home college and the teaching college at which the student is cross-enrolled may count, in the calculation of headcount or full-time equivalent student enrollment, only those course units for which the student is enrolled at each respective campus.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 743, Sec. 1.   (AB 637)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Interstate Attendance Agreements [66800. - 66804.]

66800.

The Legislature recognizes that existing community colleges in California may benefit from larger and more heterogeneous enrollment in certain curricula and that additional enrollment may often be added with little or no increase in the total operational cost of a given curriculum. It also recognizes that California residents can be provided more complete and more useful curricula in many cases if the curricula is planned and offered on the basis of the needs of an entire region.

The Legislature encourages California community college districts and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges to include the educational needs of, and facilities available in, territory adjacent to California in their planning and to make use of those needs and facilities to the extent possible in the conduct of community college education in California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66801.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges may enter into an interstate attendance agreement with any statewide public agency of another state that is responsible for public institutions of postsecondary education providing the first two years of college instruction and that is an agency of a state that is a party to the Western Interstate Compact for Higher Education, for the exchange of residents, on a one-for-one basis, for purposes of instruction.

(b) (1) As an alternative to the procedure established in subdivision (a), the board of governors may authorize the governing board of a community college district
 to enter into an interstate attendance agreement directly with the governing body of a public institution of postsecondary education providing the first two years of college instruction if the state in which the public institution is situated borders California, is a party to the Western Interstate Compact for Higher Education, and the state is not represented by a statewide public agency that is responsible for public institutions of postsecondary education providing the first two years of college instruction.

(2) Each agreement entered into under this subdivision shall satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a), and shall become effective once fully executed and approved by the governing board of each participating community college district. There shall be no need to file a resolution as described in Section 66802 or for any further
 action by the board of governors. An interstate attendance agreement entered into under this subdivision may be effective on or after July 1, 2003.

(c) The board of governors may enter into the Western Undergraduate Exchange through the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education.

(d) The agreement shall contain terms as the board of governors may adopt and that are consistent with the authority and responsibility of California community college districts and the community colleges they maintain. In no event shall an agreement permit or require the entry of California residents into institutions in another state on terms substantially different from those governing the admission of residents of the other state to California community colleges. Except as provided in
 subdivision (j) of Section 76140, agreements shall contain the provision that no additional state funds shall be required to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   (AB 1998)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66802.

The governing board of each California community college district is authorized to participate in an interstate attendance agreement entered into by the board of governors. The governing board of a California community college district elects to participate by adopting a resolution to that effect and filing that resolution with the board of governors. The participation may be limited in any manner which is consistent with terms of the interstate attendance agreement in which the district desires to participate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66803.

If the governing board of a California community college district elects to participate in an interstate attendance agreement, it may waive, as a condition to such participation, all or part of the nonresident tuition required by Section 76140 in accordance with the terms of that interstate attendance agreement. Such a waiver shall apply only to students attending a community college maintained by that district pursuant to the provisions of that interstate attendance agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

66804.

The board of governors may adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this article as these provisions apply to California community college districts or to the State of California. Such rules and regulations shall contain the provision that no additional state funds shall be required to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 797.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. Student Civic and Voter Empowerment Act [66850. - 66852.]

66850.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Student Civic and Voter Empowerment Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 559, Sec. 2.   (AB 963)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

66851.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2020, the Secretary of State, in partnership with the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California, shall conduct a program to be known as the Student Civic and Voter Empowerment Program.

(b) The Secretary of State shall evaluate and report to the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2021, and annually thereafter, the results of the program, including the number of students who registered as a result of the program, statistics relating to the outcome of the program, and any other benefits or problems that arose for the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 559, Sec. 2.   (AB 963)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

66852.

Each campus of the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, do all of the following:

(a) (1) In consultation with the Secretary of State, during the first month of each academic semester or quarter, distribute campuswide emails to all students providing the following civic and election dates and information:

(A) National Voter Registration Day, held annually on the fourth Tuesday in September.

(B) The last day to register to vote online or to register to vote by mail or in
 person.

(C) The date when a county may begin to offer early voting at the office of the elections official or at a satellite location, pursuant to Section 3016.3 of the Elections Code, and a statement that the date, times, and locations for early voting and conditional voter registration may be confirmed on the internet website of the Secretary of State or at the county elections office.

(D) The primary and general election dates as provided in Chapter 4 of Division 0.5 of the Elections Code and Division 1 of the Elections Code.

(E) A statement that, pursuant to Chapter 1 of Division 3 of the Elections Code, a voter may apply to vote by mail at any time until after the seventh day prior to an election, and that a vote by
 mail voter may vote in person at the office of the county elections official or at a satellite location established by the county elections official on or before the day of the election.

(F) A link to the internet web page for the Secretary of State’s Students Vote Project, established pursuant to Section 2148.5 of the Elections Code.
